Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0192

Discrimination—Legislative finding and declaration.

The legislature finds and declares that the costs of health care to the people are rising disproportionately to other costs and that there is a paramount concern that the right of the people to obtain access to health care in all its facets is being impaired thereby. For this reason, the reliance on the mechanism of health care service contractors, whether profit or nonprofit, is the only effective manner in which the large majority of the people can attain access to quality health care, and it is therefore declared to be in the public interest that health care service contractors be regulated to assure that all the people have access to health care to the greatest extent possible. Chapter 97, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prohibiting discrimination against the legally recognized and licensed profession of chiropractic, is necessary in the interest of the public health, welfare, and safety.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.25.120.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: "If any provision of this 1974 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 16.]